Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF125.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1265XS (1) 91 ss/ko S.F. 125 Section 1. Section 154B.3, subsection 3, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 3. An employee of a federal, state, county , or local 3 governmental institution or agency or nonprofit institution or 4 agency, or a research facility, while performing duties of the 5 office or position with such institution, agency, or facility. 6